Tennessee, session 114, SB0863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-1-101, is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Guide" means a person who accepts compensation for assisting persons
who hunt, fish, or trap, and who is required to possess a guide license issued pursuant
to § 70-2-227;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 70, Chapter 2, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
70-2-227.
The commission shall:
(1) Create and issue waterfowl guide licenses for persons who work as
waterfowl guides at Reelfoot Lake, located in Lake and Obion Counties; and
(2) Promulgate rules to effectuate this section, including rules to require
Reelfoot-specific waterfowl guides to demonstrate relevant knowledge of
Reelfoot Lake and its inherent hazards. Such rules must be accordance with the
Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
- 2 - 002885

SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 002885